Alabama, session 2026rs, HB523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
46 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as
47 the Alabama Agricultural Enhancement Program Act.
48 Section 2. For the purposes of this act, the following
49 terms have the following meanings:
50 (1) BOARD. The Alabama Agricultural Enhancement
51 Advisory Board.
52 (2) COMMISSIONER. The Commissioner of Agriculture and
53 Industries.
54 (3) PROGRAM. The Alabama Agricultural Enhancement
55 Program.
56 Section 3. (a) The Commissioner of Agriculture and
Page 2

Section 3. (a) The Commissioner of Agriculture and
HB523 INTRODUCED
57 Industries may establish the Alabama Agricultural Enhancement
58 Program to provide cost share funds to agricultural producers
59 to make long-term investments in farms and rural communities.
60 (b) Not later than September 30, 2027, the commissioner
61 shall deliver a report to the Governor, the President Pro
62 Tempore of the Senate, the Senate Minority Leader, the Speaker
63 of the House of Representatives, and the House Minority Leader
64 detailing the progress made toward establishing the program
65 and any operational or financial needs, including, but not
66 limited to, any legislative action, appropriation, or other
67 resource necessary to establish and implement the program.
68 Section 4. The Alabama Agricultural Enhancement
69 Advisory Board is established to advise and provide
70 recommendations to the commissioner regarding the program. The
71 advisory board shall consist of the following members:
72 (1) The Commissioner of Agriculture and Industries, or
73 his or her designee, who shall serve as chair.
74 (2) The Dean of the Auburn University College of
75 Agriculture, or his or her designee.
76 (3) The Dean of the Alabama Agricultural and Mechanical
77 University College of Agricultural, Life, and Natural
78 Sciences, or his or her designee.
79 (4) The Dean of the Tuskegee University College of
80 Agriculture, Environment, and Nutrition Sciences, or his or
81 her designee.
82 (5) The Chair of the State Soil and Water Conservation
83 Committee, or his or her designee.
84 Section 5. (a) The commissioner, with input from the
Page 3

Section 5. (a) The commissioner, with input from the
HB523 INTRODUCED
85 board, shall identify agriculture sectors for which the
86 program shall provide funds, and may periodically modify these
87 sectors to best meet the needs of the state's farms and rural
88 communities. The agriculture sectors for investment shall
89 include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
90 (1) Dairy.
91 (2) Genetics.
92 (3) Hay Storage.
93 (4) Herd health.
94 (5) Livestock equipment.
95 (6) Livestock solutions.
96 (7) Aquaculture.
97 (8) Poultry growers.
98 (9) Row crop solutions.
99 (10) Swine producers.
100 (11) Working structures and fence-line systems.
101 (12) Agritourism.
102 (13) Producer diversification.
103 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the board,
104 shall identify and may periodically modify the equipment and
105 structures that are eligible for purchase with program funds.
106 (c) The commissioner shall adopt reasonable criteria
107 that an applicant shall satisfy to be eligible to receive
108 program funds, including requiring an applicant to:
109 (1) Complete an educational program or certification
110 demonstrating substantial knowledge in the agriculture sector
111 for which the applicant seeks funds;
112 (2) Provide taxpayer identification information;
Page 4

(2) Provide taxpayer identification information;
HB523 INTRODUCED
113 (3) Provide proof of residency in the state;
114 (4) Clearly state the intended purpose of the purchased
115 equipment or structure;
116 (5) Attest that the applicant shall use the equipment
117 or structure purchased using program funds for the equipment's
118 or structure's intended purpose for not less than five years
119 following purchase; and
120 (6) Grant the Department of Agriculture and Industries
121 permission to inspect any equipment or structure purchased
122 using program funds to verify compliance with subdivision (5).
123 (d) Any person who knowingly provides a false or
124 misleading statement or information to the Department of
125 Agriculture and Industries in applying for funds pursuant to
126 this act may not receive any funds from or otherwise
127 participate in the program.
128 Section 6.(a) The Alabama Agricultural Enhancement Fund
129 is established in the State Treasury from which the
130 commissioner shall administer the program. The fund shall
131 consist of any monies appropriated by the Legislature and any
132 voluntary contributions, gifts, and grants.
133 (b) Monies deposited into the fund shall be disbursed
134 only upon warrants of the Comptroller drawn upon the State
135 Treasury on itemized vouchers approved by the commissioner. No
136 monies shall be withdrawn or expended except as budgeted and
137 allocated according to Article 4 of Chapter 4 and Chapter 19
138 of Title 41, Code of Alabama 1975, and only in amounts as
139 stipulated in the general appropriations act, other
140 appropriations acts, or this section. At the end of each
Page 5

appropriations acts, or this section. At the end of each
HB523 INTRODUCED
141 fiscal year, any unencumbered balance shall not revert to the
142 State General Fund under Section 41-4-93, Code of Alabama
143 1975.
144 Section 7. The Department of Agriculture and Industries
145 may adopt rules to administer this act.
146 Section 8. This act shall become effective on February
147 1, 2027.
Page 6